test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-maan_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - mään u-stem: # Noun 'moon/kuu' - full paradigm
     mään+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: mään
     mään+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: mannu
     mään+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: mannu
     mään+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: [männʼja, männǥa]
     mään+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: [mannust, männʼjest]
     mään+N+Sg+Com+Indef: [mannuin, männʼjin]
     mään+N+Ess+Indef: männʼjen
     mään+N+Par+Indef: mannud
     mään+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [mannutaa, mannutää]
     mään+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: mannu
     mään+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: mannui
     mään+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: mannuid
     mään+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: mannuid
     mään+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: mannuin
     mään+N+Pl+Com+Indef: mannuivuiʹm
     mään+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [mannuitaa, mannuitää]
